lt-LT: Orlaivių sistemų paskirtis: Sklandmuo ir konstrukcija; Avionika ir prietaisai; Kabina ir salonas; Valdymo plokštumos ir skrydžio valdikliai; Durys; Elektra ir apšvietimas; Variklis ir varytuvas; Tvirtinimo ir metalo detalės; Degalų sistema; Antžeminis aptarnavimas ir vilkimas; Hidraulika ir pneumatika; Važiuoklė ir stabdžiai; Priežiūros reikmenys ir įrankiai; Navigacija ir ryšys; Sauga ir avarinių situacijų priemonės; Langai ir sandarikliai; Kita
zh-CN: 飞机系统应用: 机身和结构; 航电和仪表; 客舱和内饰; 操纵面和飞行控制装置; 舱门; 电气和照明; 发动机和推进装置; 紧固件和五金件; 燃油系统; 地面装卸和牵引; 液压和气动装置; 起落架和刹车; 维护用品和工具; 导航和通信; 安全和应急; 窗户和密封件; 其他
es: Aplicación del sistema de aviones: Fuselaje y estructura; Aviónica e instrumentos; Cabina e interior; Superficies de control y controles de vuelo; Puertas; Sistema eléctrico e iluminación; Motor y propulsión; Sujetadores y hardware; Sistema de combustible; Gestión en tierra y remolque; Sistemas hidráulicos y neumáticos; Tren de aterrizaje y frenos; Suministros de mantenimiento y herramientas; Navegación y comunicación; Seguridad y emergencia; Ventanas y sellos; Otro
it: Applicazione per sistemi aeronautici: Cellula e struttura; Avionica e strumentazione; Cabina e interni; Superfici di controllo e comandi di volo; Porte; Impianto elettrico e illuminazione; Motore e propulsione; Fissaggi e hardware; Impianto di alimentazione; Assistenza a terra e traino; Impianto idraulico e pneumatico; Carrello di atterraggio e freni; Materiali di consumo e utensili per manutenzione; Navigazione e comunicazione; Sicurezza ed emergenza; Finestrini e guarnizioni; Altro
fr: Système aéronautique concerné: Cellule et structure; Avionique et instruments; Cabine et intérieur; Surfaces et commandes de vol; Portes; Électricité et éclairage; Moteur et propulsion; Fixations et matériel; Système de carburant; Manutention au sol et remorquage; Hydraulique et pneumatique; Train d’atterrissage et freins; Fournitures de maintenance et outillage; Navigation et communication; Sécurité et urgence; Fenêtres et joints; Autre
de: Anwendung in Flugzeugsystem: Flugwerk & Struktur; Avionik & Instrumente; Kabine & Innenausstattung; Steuerflächen & Flugsteuerung; Türen; Elektrik & Beleuchtung; Triebwerk & Antrieb; Befestigungselemente & Hardware; Kraftstoffsystem; Bodenabfertigung & Schleppen; Hydraulik & Pneumatik; Fahrwerk & Bremsen; Wartungsmaterialien & Werkzeuge; Navigation & Kommunikation; Sicherheit & Notfall; Fenster & Dichtungen; Sonstige
en: Aircraft system application: Airframe & structure; Avionics & instruments; Cabin & interior; Control surfaces & flight controls; Doors; Electrical & lighting; Engine & propulsion; Fasteners & hardware; Fuel system; Ground handling & towing; Hydraulics & pneumatics; Landing gear & brakes; Maintenance supplies & tooling; Navigation & communication; Safety & emergency; windows & seals; Other
pt-BR: Aplicação do sistema da aeronave: Fuselagem e estrutura; Aviônicos e instrumentos; Cabine e interior; Superfícies de controle e controles de voo; Portas; Sistema elétrico e iluminação; Motor e propulsão; Fixadores e equipamentos; Sistema de combustível; Manuseio em solo e reboque; Sistemas hidráulicos e pneumáticos; Trem de pouso e freios; Suprimentos e ferramentas de manutenção; Navegação e comunicação; Segurança e emergência; Janelas e vedações; Outro
nb: Flysystemapp: Skrog og struktur; Avionikk og instrumenter; Kabin og interiør; Styreflater og flykontroller; Dører; Elektrisk og belysning; Motor og fremdrift; Festemidler og maskinvare; Drivstoffsystem; Bakketjenester og tauing; Hydraulikk og pneumatikk; Landingsstell og bremser; Vedlikeholdsutstyr og verktøy; Navigasjon og kommunikasjon; Sikkerhet og nødstilfeller; Vinduer og tetninger; Annet
ko: 항공기 시스템 적용 분야: 기체 및 구조물; 항공 전자 장비 및 계기; 객실 및 인테리어; 조종면 및 비행 조종 장치; 도어; 전기 및 조명; 엔진 및 추진 장치; 패스너 및 하드웨어; 연료 시스템; 지상 취급 및 견인; 유압 및 공압; 랜딩 기어 및 브레이크; 유지보수 용품 및 공구; 항법 및 통신; 안전 및 비상; 창문 및 씰; 기타
tr: Uçak sistemi uygulaması: Gövde ve yapı; Aviyonik ve göstergeler; Kabin ve iç kısım; Kontrol yüzeyleri ve uçuş kontrolleri; Kapılar; Elektrik ve aydınlatma; Motor ve itki; Bağlantı elemanları ve donanım; Yakıt sistemi; Yer hizmetleri ve çekme; Hidrolik ve pnömatik; İniş takımları ve frenler; Bakım malzemeleri ve aletler; Seyrüsefer ve iletişim; Güvenlik ve acil durum; Pencereler ve contalar; Diğer
da: Anvendelse af luftfartøjets system: Skrog og struktur; Avionik og instrumenter; Kabine og interiør; Styreflader og flyvekontrol; Døre; El og belysning; Motor og fremdrift; Beslag og hardware; Brændstofsystem; Ground handling og bugsering; Hydraulik og pneumatik; Landingsstel og bremser; Vedligeholdelsesartikler og værktøj; Navigation og kommunikation; Sikkerhed og nødsituationer; Vinduer og tætninger; Andet
sk-SK: Aplikácia leteckého systému: Drak a konštrukcia; Avionika a prístroje; Kabína a interiér; Riadiace plochy a systémy riadenia; Dvere; Elektroinštalácia a osvetlenie; Motor a pohon; Spojovací materiál a hardvér; Palivový systém; Pozemná manipulácia a ťahanie; Hydraulika a pneumatika; Podvozok a brzdy; Materiál a náradie na údržbu; Navigácia a komunikácia; Bezpečnostné a núdzové vybavenie; Okná a tesnenia; Iné
ja: 航空機システムアプリ: 機体および構造; アビオニクスおよび計器; キャビンおよび内装; 操縦翼面および飛行操縦装置; ドア; 電気および照明; エンジンおよび推進装置; ファスナーおよびハードウェア; 燃料システム; グラウンドハンドリングおよび牽引; 油圧および空圧; 着陸装置およびブレーキ; メンテナンス用品およびツール; 航法および通信; 安全および緊急; 窓およびシール; その他
ru: Применение в системах воздушного судна: Планер и конструкция; Авионика и приборы; Кабина и интерьер; Поверхности управления и органы управления полетом; Двери; Электрика и освещение; Двигатель и силовая установка; Крепежи и оборудование; Топливная система; Наземное обслуживание и буксировка; Гидравлика и пневматика; Шасси и тормоза; Расходные материалы и инструменты для техобслуживания; Навигация и связь; Безопасность и аварийные системы; Окна и уплотнители; Другое
hu: Repülőgéprendszer-alkalmazás: Sárkányszerkezet és felépítmény; Repüléselektronika és műszerek; Utastér és belső tér; Kormánylapok és repülésvezérlők; Ajtók; Elektromos hálózat és világítás; Hajtómű és meghajtás; Kötőelemek és hardver; Üzemanyag-rendszer; Földi kiszolgálás és vontatás; Hidraulika és pneumatika; Futómű és fékek; Karbantartási kellékek és szerszámok; Navigáció és kommunikáció; Biztonság és vészhelyzet; Ablakok és tömítések; Egyéb
sl-SI: Aplikacija letalskega sistema: Ogrodje in struktura; Avionika in instrumenti; Kabina in notranjost; Krmilne površine in krmiljenje; Vrata; Elektrika in razsvetljava; Motor in pogon; Spojni elementi in okovje; Sistem za gorivo; Zemeljska oskrba in vleka; Hidravlika in pnevmatika; Podvozje in zavore; Material in orodje za vzdrževanje; Navigacija in komunikacija; Varnost in reševanje; Okna in tesnila; Drugo
el: Εφαρμογή συστήματος αεροσκαφών: Άτρακτος και δομή; Ηλεκτρονικά συστήματα και όργανα; Καμπίνα και εσωτερικό; Επιφάνειες ελέγχου και χειριστήρια πτήσης; Θύρες; Ηλεκτρικά συστήματα και φωτισμός; Κινητήρας και προώθηση; Συνδετήρες και υλικός εξοπλισμός; Σύστημα καυσίμου; Επίγεια εξυπηρέτηση και ρυμούλκηση; Υδραυλικά και πνευματικά συστήματα; Σύστημα προσγείωσης και φρένα; Είδη συντήρησης και εργαλεία; Πλοήγηση και επικοινωνία; Ασφάλεια και έκτακτη ανάγκη; Παράθυρα και στεγανοποιητικά; Άλλο
ro-RO: Aplicare în sistemul aeronavei: Fuzelaj și structură; Avionică și instrumente; Cabină și interior; Suprafețe de comandă și comenzi de zbor; Uși; Electrice și iluminat; Motor și propulsie; Elemente de fixare și hardware; Sistem de combustibil; Gestionare la sol și tractare; Hidraulice și pneumatice; Tren de aterizare și frâne; Consumabile de întreținere și scule; Navigare și comunicații; Siguranță și urgență; Ferestre și garnituri; Altele
pl: Wykorzystany system statku powietrznego: Płatowiec i konstrukcja; Awionika i przyrządy; Kabina i wnętrze; Powierzchnie sterowe i układy sterowania lotem; Drzwi; Elektryka i oświetlenie; Silnik i napęd; Elementy złączne i osprzęt; Układ paliwowy; Obsługa naziemna i holowanie; Hydraulika i pneumatyka; Podwozie i hamulce; Materiały eksploatacyjne i narzędzia; Nawigacja i komunikacja; Bezpieczeństwo i ratownictwo; Okna i uszczelki; Inne
th: การใช้งานในระบบอากาศยาน: โครงสร้างอากาศยานและโครงสร้าง; ระบบการบินและเครื่องวัด; ห้องโดยสารและภายใน; พื้นผิวบังคับการบินและระบบควบคุมการบิน; ประตู; ระบบไฟฟ้าและระบบไฟส่องสว่าง; เครื่องยนต์และระบบขับเคลื่อน; สลักภัณฑ์และฮาร์ดแวร์; ระบบเชื้อเพลิง; การจัดการภาคพื้นดินและการลากจูง; ไฮดรอลิกและนิวเมติก; ล้อเครื่องบินและเบรก; อุปกรณ์และเครื่องมือการบำรุงรักษา; การนำทางและการสื่อสาร; ความปลอดภัยและเหตุฉุกเฉิน; หน้าต่างและซีล; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 飛機系統應用: 機身與結構; 航電設備與儀器; 機艙與內部; 控制面與飛行控制系統; 艙門; 電氣與照明; 引擎與推進系統; 緊固件與硬體; 燃油系統; 地勤與拖曳; 液壓與氣動; 起落架與煞車; 維修用品與工具; 導航與通訊; 安全與緊急; 窗戶與密封件; 其他
fi: Lentokonejärjestelmän käyttötarkoitus: Lentokoneen runko ja rakenne; Avioniikka ja mittarit; Matkustamo ja sisätilat; Ohjainpinnat ja lennonohjaus; Ovet; Sähkö ja valaistus; Moottori ja propulsio; Kiinnikkeet ja laitteisto; Polttoainejärjestelmä; Maakäsittely ja hinaus; Hydrauliikka ja pneumatiikka; Laskuteline ja jarrut; Huoltotarvikkeet ja työkalut; Navigointi ja viestintä; Turvallisuus ja hätätilanteet; Ikkunat ja tiivisteet; Muu
nl: Toepassing vliegtuigsysteem: Casco & structuur; Avionica & instrumenten; Cabine & interieur; Stuurvlakken & besturingselementen; Deuren; Elektriciteit & verlichting; Motor & aandrijving; Bevestigingsmiddelen & hardware; Brandstofsysteem; Grondafhandeling & slepen; Hydrauliek & pneumatiek; Landingsgestel & remmen; Onderhoudsbenodigdheden & gereedschap; Navigatie & communicatie; Veiligheid & noodgevallen; Ramen & afdichtingen; Overig
vi: Ứng dụng hệ thống máy bay: Khung và cấu trúc máy bay; Hệ thống điện tử hàng không và khí cụ; Khoang hành khách và nội thất; Bề mặt điều khiển và hệ thống điều khiển chuyến bay; Cửa; Điện và hệ thống chiếu sáng; Động cơ và hệ thống đẩy; Chốt và trang thiết bị; Hệ thống nhiên liệu; Xử lý trên mặt đất và lai dắt; Hệ thống thủy lực và khí nén; Bộ càng đáp và phanh; Vật tư và dụng cụ bảo trì; Hệ thống điều hướng và liên lạc; Hệ thống an toàn và khẩn cấp; Cửa sổ và gioăng chống thấm; Khác
sv: App för flygplanssystem: Flygplansskrov och struktur; Avionik och instrument; Kabin och interiör; Roderytor och flygkontroller; Dörrar; El och belysning; Motor och framdrivning; Fästelement och utrustning; Bränslesystem; Markhantering och bogsering; Hydraulik och pneumatik; Landningsställ och bromsar; Underhållsmaterial och verktyg; Navigering och kommunikation; Säkerhet och nödsituation; Fönster och tätningar; Annan
cs: Aplikace leteckých systémů: Drak a konstrukce; Avionika a přístroje; Kabina a interiér; Řídicí plochy a systémy řízení letu; Dveře; Elektroinstalace a osvětlení; Motor a pohon; Spojovací prvky a hardware; Palivový systém; Pozemní odbavení a tažení; Hydraulika a pneumatika; Přistávací podvozek a brzdy; Údržbový materiál a nástroje; Navigace a komunikace; Bezpečnostní a nouzové vybavení; Okna a těsnění; Jiné
pt-PT: Aplicação do sistema da aeronave: Fuselagem e estrutura; Aviónicos e instrumentos; Cabina e interior; Superfícies de controlo e controlos de voo; Portas; Elétrica e iluminação; Motor e propulsão; Fixadores e ferragens; Sistema de combustível; Assistência em escala e reboque; Hidráulica e pneumática; Trem de aterragem e travões; Consumíveis e ferramentas de manutenção; Navegação e comunicação; Segurança e emergência; Janelas e vedantes; Outro
hr-HR: Primjena zrakoplovnog sustava: Konstrukcija i struktura zrakoplova; Avionika i instrumenti; Kabina i unutrašnjost; Kormila i komande leta; Vrata; Elektrika i rasvjeta; Motor i pogon; Pričvršćivači i okov; Sustav za gorivo; Zemaljsko opsluživanje i vuča; Hidraulika i pneumatika; Stajni trap i kočnice; Potrepštine za održavanje i alati; Navigacija i komunikacija; Sigurnost i hitni slučajevi; Prozori i brtve; Ostalo
bg-BG: Приложение на системата на въздухоплавателното средство: Корпус и структура; Авионика и инструменти; Кабина и интериор; Контролни повърхности и управление на полета; Врати; Електричество и осветление; Двигател и задвижване; Крепежни елементи и хардуер; Горивна система; Наземно обслужване и теглене; Хидравлика и пневматика; Колесници и спирачки; Консумативи за поддръжка и инструменти; Навигация и комуникация; Безопасност и аварийни ситуации; Прозорци и уплътнения; Друго